Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1032
Jurisdiction, defined.

Jurisdiction means the District of Columbia and any state, territory, or possession of the United States of America.

Laws 1986, LB 318, § 21;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-360;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 294.